Maryland, session 2026, SB0372.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Housing and Community Development
SUBTITLE 31. MARYLAND NEW MARKETS DEVELOPMENT PROGRAM.
4–3101.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “MARYLAND QUALIFIED COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT ENTITY” MEANS A
QUALIFIED COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT ENTITY HEADQUARTERED IN THE STATE OR
OWNED OR CONTROLLED BY A BUSINESS ENTITY HEADQUARTERED IN THE STATE.
(C) “PRINCIPAL BUSINESS OPERATIONS” MEANS THE PLACE OR PLACES
WHERE:
(1) AT LEAST 60% OF A QUALIFIED ACTIVE LOW–INCOME COMMUNITY
BUSINESS’S EMPLOYEES WORK; OR
(2) EMPLOYEES WHO ARE PAID AT LEAST 60% OF A QUALIFIED ACTIVE
LOW–INCOME COMMUNITY BUSINESS’S PAYROLL WORK.
(D) “PROGRAM” MEANS THE MARYLAND NEW MARKETS DEVELOPMENT
PROGRAM.
(E) (1) “QUALIFIED ACTIVE LOW–INCOME COMMUNITY BUSINESS”
MEANS A BUSINESS ENTITY THAT:
(I) HAS ITS PRINCIPAL BUSINESS OPERATIONS IN THE STATE;
AND
(II) MEETS THE DEFINITION OF A QUALIFIED ACTIVE
LOW–INCOME COMMUNITY BUSINESS UNDER § 45D OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE
CODE.
(2) “QUALIFIED ACTIVE LOW–INCOME COMMUNITY BUSINESS” DOES
NOT INCLUDE A BUSINESS ENTITY THAT DERIVES OR PROJECTS TO DERIVE AT LEAST
15% OF ANNUAL REVENUE FROM THE RENTAL OR SALE OF REAL ESTATE, UNLESS
THE BUSINESS ENTITY OWNS OR CONTROLS A SUBSIDIARY BUSINESS ENTITY THAT:

SENATE BILL 372 3
(I) DERIVES OR PROJECTS TO DERIVE LESS THAN 15% OF
ANNUAL REVENUE FROM THE RENTAL OR SALE OF REAL ESTATE; AND
(II) IS THE PRIMARY TENANT OF REAL ESTATE OWNED BY THE
PARENT ENTITY.
(F) “QUALIFIED COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT ENTITY” MEANS A BUSINESS
ENTITY THAT HAS ENTERED INTO AN ALLOCATION AGREEMENT UNDER THE
FEDERAL NEW MARKETS TAX CREDIT PROGRAM THAT INCLUDES THE STATE
WITHIN THE SERVICE AREA OF THE AGREEMENT.
(G) “QUALIFIED EQUITY INVESTMENT” MEANS AN EQUITY INVESTMENT IN
A QUALIFIED COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT ENTITY THAT:
(1) (I) IS ORIGINALLY ISSUED AND ACQUIRED ON OR AFTER JULY
1, 2026, IN EXCHANGE FOR CASH; OR
(II) IS ORIGINALLY ISSUED AND ACQUIRED BEFORE JULY 1,
2026, IN EXCHANGE FOR CASH AND, ON OR AFTER JULY 1, 2026, IS TRANSFERRED
OR SOLD;
(2) THE QUALIFIED COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT ENTITY USES IN AN
AMOUNT EQUAL TO 100% OF THE CASH PURCHASE PRICE TO MAKE QUALIFIED
LOW–INCOME COMMUNITY INVESTMENTS IN QUALIFIED ACTIVE LOW–INCOME
COMMUNITY BUSINESSES;
(3) DOES NOT EXCEED DOUBLE THE QUALIFIED COMMUNITY
DEVELOPMENT ENTITY’S EQUITY INVESTMENT AUTHORITY UNDER THE FEDERAL
NEW MARKETS TAX CREDIT PROGRAM UNLESS THE QUALIFIED COMMUNITY
DEVELOPMENT ENTITY IS A MARYLAND QUALIFIED COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT
ENTITY;
(4) IS DESIGNATED AS A QUALIFIED EQUITY INVESTMENT UNDER THE
FEDERAL NEW MARKETS TAX CREDIT PROGRAM BY THE QUALIFIED COMMUNITY
DEVELOPMENT ENTITY IN AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO AT LEAST 50% OF THE CASH
PURCHASE PRICE UNLESS THE QUALIFIED COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT ENTITY IS A
MARYLAND QUALIFIED COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT ENTITY;
(5) IS DESIGNATED AS A QUALIFIED EQUITY INVESTMENT UNDER
THIS SUBTITLE BY THE QUALIFIED COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT ENTITY; AND

SENATE BILL 372
(6) IS JOINTLY CERTIFIED AS A QUALIFIED EQUITY INVESTMENT
UNDER THIS SUBTITLE BY THE QUALIFIED COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT ENTITY AND
THE DEPARTMENT.
(H) “QUALIFIED LOW–INCOME COMMUNITY INVESTMENT” MEANS A
CAPITAL OR EQUITY INVESTMENT IN OR LOAN TO A QUALIFIED ACTIVE LOW–INCOME
COMMUNITY BUSINESS.
4–3102.
(A) THERE IS A MARYLAND NEW MARKETS DEVELOPMENT PROGRAM.
(B) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADMINISTER THE PROGRAM.
(C) THE PURPOSE OF THE PROGRAM IS TO INCENTIVIZE ECONOMIC
INVESTMENT AND JOB CREATION IN LOW–INCOME COMMUNITIES THAT HAVE
HISTORICALLY LACKED PRIVATE INVESTMENT, PARTICULARLY WITH THE
ASSISTANCE OF COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT ENTITIES HEADQUARTERED IN THE
STATE WITH PROVEN EXPERIENCE IN THE FEDERAL NEW MARKETS TAX CREDIT
PROGRAM.
4–3103.
(A) A BUSINESS ENTITY THAT DOES NOT MEET THE REQUIREMENTS TO BE
CONSIDERED A QUALIFIED ACTIVE LOW–INCOME COMMUNITY BUSINESS UNDER
THIS SUBTITLE BECAUSE THE BUSINESS ENTITY’S PRINCIPAL BUSINESS
OPERATIONS ARE NOT IN THE STATE MAY BE CONSIDERED A QUALIFIED ACTIVE
LOW–INCOME COMMUNITY BUSINESS UNDER THIS SUBTITLE IF THE BUSINESS
ENTITY AGREES TO:
(1) RELOCATE OR HIRE EMPLOYEES TO ESTABLISH PRINCIPAL
BUSINESS OPERATIONS IN THE STATE;
(2) USE THE PROCEEDS OF A QUALIFIED LOW–INCOME COMMUNITY
INVESTMENT TO HIRE OR RELOCATE THE EMPLOYEES; AND
(3) HIRE OR RELOCATE THE EMPLOYEES WITHIN 180 DAYS AFTER
RECEIVING THE QUALIFIED LOW–INCOME COMMUNITY INVESTMENT, OR ON A LATER
DATE AGREED TO BY THE DEPARTMENT.
(B) A BUSINESS ENTITY SHALL BE CONSIDERED A QUALIFIED ACTIVE
LOW–INCOME COMMUNITY BUSINESS UNDER THIS SUBTITLE IF THE QUALIFIED
COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT ENTITY REASONABLY EXPECTS AT THE TIME OF AN

SENATE BILL 372 5
APPLICATION UNDER § 4–3105 OF THIS SUBTITLE THAT THE BUSINESS ENTITY WILL
MEET THE DEFINITION OF A QUALIFIED ACTIVE LOW–INCOME COMMUNITY
BUSINESS FOR THE ENTIRE DURATION OF THE QUALIFIED LOW–INCOME
COMMUNITY INVESTMENT.
4–3104.
(A) A PERSON MAY CLAIM A CREDIT FOR A QUALIFIED EQUITY INVESTMENT
IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBTITLE AGAINST:
(1) THE STATE INCOME TAX; OR
(2) ANY PREMIUM RECEIPTS TAX OR INSURANCE RETALIATORY TAX,
FEE, CHARGE, OR PENALTY IMPOSED BY THE STATE, INCLUDING ANY TAX, FEE,
CHARGE, OR PENALTY UNDER:
(I) § 3–324 OF THE INSURANCE ARTICLE;
(II) § 4–209 OF THE INSURANCE ARTICLE;
(III) § 4–211 OF THE INSURANCE ARTICLE;
(IV) § 4–211.1 OF THE INSURANCE ARTICLE;
(V) § 6–102 OF THE INSURANCE ARTICLE; AND
(VI) TITLE 6, SUBTITLE 3 OF THE INSURANCE ARTICLE.
(B) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, A PERSON MAY CLAIM
THE CREDIT ALLOWED UNDER THIS SECTION:
(1) FOR THE TAXABLE YEAR DURING WHICH THE QUALIFIED EQUITY
INVESTMENT IS MADE; AND
(2) FOR THE NEXT 6 TAXABLE YEARS.
(C) THE AMOUNT OF THE CREDIT ALLOWED UNDER THIS SECTION EQUALS:
(1) FOR THE FIRST 3 TAXABLE YEARS UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS
SECTION, THE PURCHASE PRICE PAID FOR THE QUALIFIED EQUITY INVESTMENT
MULTIPLIED BY 5%; AND

SENATE BILL 372
(2) FOR THE FINAL 4 TAXABLE YEARS UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF
THIS SECTION, THE PURCHASE PRICE PAID FOR THE QUALIFIED EQUITY
INVESTMENT MULTIPLIED BY 8.75%.
(D) THE COMPTROLLER OR THE MARYLAND INSURANCE ADMINISTRATION
MAY NOT IMPOSE ANY ADDITIONAL INCOME TAX, PREMIUM RECEIPTS TAX, OR
INSURANCE RETALIATORY TAX, FEE, CHARGE, OR PENALTY, AS APPLICABLE, OR ANY
OTHER TAX OR FEE ON A PERSON:
(1) IN ORDER FOR THE PERSON TO CLAIM A CREDIT ALLOWED UNDER
THIS SECTION; OR
(2) AS A RESULT OF CLAIMING A CREDIT ALLOWED UNDER THIS
SECTION.
(E) THE CREDIT ALLOWED UNDER THIS SECTION:
(1) (I) MAY NOT BE SOLD; BUT
(II) MAY BE TRANSFERRED TO AN AFFILIATED BUSINESS
ENTITY; AND
(2) MAY BE ALLOCATED AMONG THE PARTNERS, MEMBERS, OR
SHAREHOLDERS OF A BUSINESS ENTITY IN ANY MANNER AGREED TO BY THE
PARTNERS, MEMBERS, OR SHAREHOLDERS IN WRITING.
(F) IF THE CREDIT ALLOWED UNDER THIS SECTION IN ANY TAXABLE YEAR
EXCEEDS THE STATE INCOME TAX, THE STATE PREMIUM RECEIPTS TAX, OR THE
STATE INSURANCE RETALIATORY TAX, FEE, CHARGE, OR PENALTY OWED FOR THAT
TAXABLE YEAR, THE PERSON MAY CLAIM A REFUND FOR THE AMOUNT OF THE
EXCESS.
(G) IF THE CREDIT ALLOWED UNDER THIS SECTION IN ANY TAXABLE YEAR
IS PROHIBITED FOR THAT TAXABLE YEAR, ANY UNUSED CREDIT MAY BE CARRIED
FORWARD AND APPLIED FOR SUCCEEDING TAXABLE YEARS UNTIL THE EARLIER OF:
(1) THE DATE ON WHICH THE FULL AMOUNT OF THE CREDIT IS USED;
OR
(2) THE DATE OF THE EXPIRATION OF THE 5TH YEAR AFTER THE
TAXABLE YEAR FOR WHICH THE CREDIT WAS ALLOWED.
4–3105.

SENATE BILL 372 7
(A) TO DESIGNATE AN EQUITY INVESTMENT AS A QUALIFIED EQUITY
INVESTMENT ELIGIBLE FOR A CREDIT UNDER THIS SUBTITLE AND OBTAIN A CREDIT
CERTIFICATE, A QUALIFIED COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT ENTITY SHALL SUBMIT AN
APPLICATION TO THE DEPARTMENT, USING A FORM ESTABLISHED BY THE
DEPARTMENT, THAT INCLUDES:
(1) THE NAME, ADDRESS, AND TAX IDENTIFICATION NUMBER OF THE
APPLICANT;
(2) THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION IF THE APPLICANT IS NOT A
MARYLAND QUALIFIED COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT ENTITY:
(I) EVIDENCE OF THE APPLICANT’S CERTIFICATION AS A
QUALIFIED COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT ENTITY UNDER THE FEDERAL NEW
MARKETS TAX CREDIT PROGRAM;
(II) A COPY OF THE APPLICANT’S ALLOCATION AGREEMENT
ESTABLISHED UNDER THE FEDERAL NEW MARKETS TAX CREDIT PROGRAM;
(III) A STATEMENT ATTESTING THAT THE APPLICANT’S
ALLOCATION AGREEMENT ESTABLISHED UNDER THE FEDERAL NEW MARKETS TAX
CREDIT PROGRAM IS VALID AND HAS NOT BEEN REVOKED OR CANCELED; AND
(IV) THE AMOUNT AND EVIDENCE OF THE APPLICANT’S
QUALIFIED EQUITY INVESTMENT AUTHORITY UNDER THE FEDERAL NEW MARKETS
TAX CREDIT PROGRAM;
(3) A DESCRIPTION OF THE PROPOSED AMOUNT, STRUCTURE, AND
PURCHASER OF THE EQUITY INVESTMENT;
(4) IF THE APPLICANT IS A MARYLAND QUALIFIED COMMUNITY
DEVELOPMENT ENTITY, WHETHER THE APPLICANT ELECTS TO RECEIVE
ADDITIONAL ALLOCATIONS OF REDISTRIBUTED CREDITS THAT MAY BECOME
AVAILABLE IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 4–3106(C) OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(5) ANY OTHER INFORMATION THAT THE DEPARTMENT REQUIRES.
(B) A QUALIFIED COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT ENTITY SHALL PAY THE
DEPARTMENT AN APPLICATION FEE OF $5,000 FOR EACH APPLICATION SUBMITTED
UNDER THIS SECTION.

SENATE BILL 372
(C) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROCESS APPLICATIONS UNDER THIS
SECTION DURING APPLICATION PERIODS IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBSECTION.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL OPEN AN INITIAL APPLICATION PERIOD
ON SEPTEMBER 1, 2026.
(3) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL OPEN ADDITIONAL APPLICATION
PERIODS ON SEPTEMBER 1, 2028, AND EACH SEPTEMBER 1 EVERY 2 YEARS
THEREAFTER.
(4) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (5) OF THIS SUBSECTION AND
FOLLOWING PUBLICATION IN THE FEDERAL REGISTER OF A NOTICE OF FUNDING
AVAILABILITY UNDER THE FEDERAL NEW MARKETS TAX CREDIT PROGRAM
DURING A YEAR IN WHICH AN APPLICATION PERIOD IS SCHEDULED TO OCCUR, THE
DEPARTMENT MAY ADVANCE OR DELAY THE START DATE OF AN APPLICATION
PERIOD UNDER THIS SUBSECTION BY NOT LONGER THAN 60 DAYS TO ALIGN WITH
THE NOTICE OF FUNDING AVAILABILITY.
(5) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL COMPLETE EACH APPLICATION
PERIOD AND JOINTLY CERTIFY EACH QUALIFIED EQUITY INVESTMENT ELIGIBLE
FOR A CREDIT UNDER THIS SUBTITLE IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 4–3106 OF THIS
SUBTITLE IN THE CALENDAR YEAR THE APPLICATION PERIOD IS SCHEDULED TO
OCCUR UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
(6) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PUBLISH NOTICE OF AN APPLICATION
PERIOD AT LEAST 30 DAYS PRIOR TO THE START OF THE APPLICATION PERIOD.
(D) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(I) EVALUATE EACH APPLICATION BASED ON THE AMOUNT OF
THE EQUITY INVESTMENT IN THE APPLICATION COMPARED TO THE TOTAL AMOUNT
OF EQUITY INVESTMENTS IN ALL APPLICATIONS RECEIVED ON THE SAME DAY; AND
(II) APPROVE OR DENY EACH APPLICATION UNDER THIS
SECTION EITHER IN FULL OR IN PART WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER RECEIPT OF THE
APPLICATION.
(2) IF THE DEPARTMENT DENIES ANY PART OF AN APPLICATION, THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL INFORM THE APPLICANT OF THE GROUNDS FOR THE DENIAL
IN WRITING.

SENATE BILL 372 9
(3) IF THE APPLICANT PROVIDES ADDITIONAL INFORMATION WITHIN
15 DAYS AFTER RECEIVING A NOTICE AND EXPLANATION OF A DENIAL, THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL RECONSIDER THE APPLICATION.
(4) IF THE APPLICANT FAILS TO PROVIDE ADDITIONAL INFORMATION
WITHIN 15 DAYS AFTER RECEIVING A NOTICE AND EXPLANATION OF A DENIAL, THE
DEPARTMENT MAY NOT RECONSIDER THE APPLICATION.
(5) IF THE DEPARTMENT APPROVES AN APPLICATION, THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE WRITTEN NOTICE OF THE DESIGNATION OF THE
QUALIFIED EQUITY INVESTMENT TO THE QUALIFIED COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT
ENTITY.
(E) A QUALIFIED COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT ENTITY MAY WITHDRAW AN
APPLICATION AT ANY TIME BY NOTIFYING THE DEPARTMENT IN WRITING.
4–3106.
(A) (1) WHEN A QUALIFIED COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT ENTITY OBTAINS
APPROVAL OF AN APPLICATION AND A DESIGNATION OF A QUALIFIED EQUITY
INVESTMENT, THE DEPARTMENT AND THE QUALIFIED COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT
ENTITY SHALL JOINTLY CERTIFY ALL OR PART OF EACH QUALIFIED EQUITY
INVESTMENT ELIGIBLE FOR A CREDIT UNDER THIS SUBTITLE, INCLUDING:
(I) THE ELIGIBLE TAXPAYER;
(II) THE ELIGIBLE AMOUNT OF THE CREDIT; AND
(III) THE ELIGIBLE TAXABLE YEARS.
(2) ON CERTIFICATION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ISSUE EACH
TAXPAYER ELIGIBLE FOR A CREDIT A CREDIT CERTIFICATE FOR EACH TAXABLE
YEAR FOR WHICH THE TAXPAYER IS ELIGIBLE.
(3) A QUALIFIED COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT ENTITY MAY TRANSFER
A QUALIFIED EQUITY INVESTMENT’S CERTIFICATION TO AN AFFILIATED BUSINESS
ENTITY IF THE AFFILIATED BUSINESS ENTITY MEETS THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
(4) A QUALIFIED COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT ENTITY HAS AN
ONGOING DUTY TO INFORM THE DEPARTMENT OF ANY CHANGE MADE TO A
QUALIFIED EQUITY INVESTMENT CERTIFIED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.

SENATE BILL 372
(B) (1) WITHIN 60 DAYS AFTER CERTIFICATION UNDER SUBSECTION (A)
OF THIS SECTION, THE QUALIFIED COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT ENTITY SHALL:
(I) ISSUE THE QUALIFIED EQUITY INVESTMENT; AND
(II) DESIGNATE THE EQUITY INVESTMENT IN AN AMOUNT
EQUAL TO AT LEAST 50% OF THE CASH PURCHASE PRICE AS A QUALIFIED EQUITY
INVESTMENT UNDER THE FEDERAL NEW MARKETS TAX CREDIT PROGRAM, UNLESS
THE QUALIFIED COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT ENTITY IS A MARYLAND QUALIFIED
COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT ENTITY.
(2) WITHIN 90 DAYS AFTER CERTIFICATION UNDER SUBSECTION (A)
OF THIS SECTION, THE QUALIFIED COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT ENTITY SHALL
PROVIDE THE DEPARTMENT WITH EVIDENCE OF:
(I) THE RECEIPT OF CASH PAYMENT FOR THE QUALIFIED
EQUITY INVESTMENT; AND
(II) DESIGNATION OF THE EQUITY INVESTMENT IN AN AMOUNT
EQUAL TO AT LEAST 50% OF THE CASH PURCHASE PRICE AS A QUALIFIED EQUITY
INVESTMENT UNDER THE FEDERAL NEW MARKETS TAX CREDIT PROGRAM, UNLESS
THE QUALIFIED COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT ENTITY IS A MARYLAND QUALIFIED
COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT ENTITY.
(3) IF A QUALIFIED COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT ENTITY FAILS TO
SATISFY A REQUIREMENT OF THIS SUBSECTION:
(I) THE CERTIFICATION UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION SHALL LAPSE; AND
(II) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL REDISTRIBUTE THE CREDIT
AMONG APPROVED APPLICANTS THAT ARE MARYLAND QUALIFIED COMMUNITY
DEVELOPMENT ENTITIES ON A PRO RATA BASIS.
(C) IF THE DEPARTMENT DOES NOT CERTIFY THE MAXIMUM AGGREGATE
AVAILABLE CREDIT UNDER § 4–3107 OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL
REDISTRIBUTE THE CREDIT AMONG APPROVED APPLICANTS THAT ARE MARYLAND
QUALIFIED COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT ENTITIES THAT HAVE ELECTED TO RECEIVE
ADDITIONAL ALLOCATIONS ON A PRO RATA BASIS.
(D) IF, AFTER A RECONSIDERATION OF APPLICATIONS UNDER SUBSECTION
(C) OF THIS SECTION, THE DEPARTMENT DOES NOT CERTIFY THE MAXIMUM

SENATE BILL 372 11
AGGREGATE AVAILABLE CREDIT UNDER § 4–3107 OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(1) ACCEPT NEW APPLICATIONS FOR THE SAME CALENDAR YEAR IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 4–3105 OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(2) WAIVE:
(I) THE REQUIREMENT, IF APPLICABLE, THAT A QUALIFIED
EQUITY INVESTMENT UNDER THIS SUBTITLE NOT EXCEED DOUBLE THE QUALIFIED
COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT ENTITY’S EQUITY INVESTMENT AUTHORITY UNDER THE
FEDERAL NEW MARKETS TAX CREDIT PROGRAM; AND
(II) THE REQUIREMENT, IF APPLICABLE, THAT A QUALIFIED
EQUITY INVESTMENT UNDER THIS SUBTITLE BE DESIGNATED AS A QUALIFIED
EQUITY INVESTMENT UNDER THE FEDERAL NEW MARKETS TAX CREDIT PROGRAM.
4–3107.
(A) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, THE DEPARTMENT MAY
NOT ISSUE CREDIT CERTIFICATES FOR CREDIT AMOUNTS THAT IN THE AGGREGATE
TOTAL MORE THAN $18,750,000 FOR ANY TAXABLE YEAR.
(B) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
THE DEPARTMENT MAY NOT ISSUE CREDIT CERTIFICATES THAT IN THE AGGREGATE
TOTAL MORE THAN $9,375,000 FOR EACH SCHEDULED APPLICATION PERIOD UNDER
§ 4–3105 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) ANY PART OF THE AGGREGATE CREDIT AMOUNTS AVAILABLE FOR
ANY SCHEDULED APPLICATION PERIOD THAT IS NOT ISSUED BY THE DEPARTMENT
IN THAT APPLICATION PERIOD MAY BE CARRIED OVER AND ISSUED DURING ANY
SUBSEQUENT APPLICATION PERIOD.
4–3108.
(A) THE COMPLIANCE AND RECAPTURE PROVISIONS OF THIS SECTION
APPLY SEPARATELY WITH RESPECT TO EACH CREDIT CERTIFICATE ISSUED UNDER
THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL RECAPTURE ALL OR A PORTION OF A CREDIT
ISSUED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE AND ANY FUTURE CREDIT SHALL BE FORFEITED IF:

SENATE BILL 372
(1) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, ANY AMOUNT OF
A FEDERAL TAX CREDIT ISSUED FOR A QUALIFIED EQUITY INVESTMENT UNDER THE
FEDERAL NEW MARKETS TAX CREDIT PROGRAM IS RECAPTURED;
(2) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, A QUALIFIED
COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT ENTITY REDEEMS OR REPAYS THE PRINCIPAL AMOUNT
OF THE QUALIFIED EQUITY INVESTMENT PRIOR TO THE EXPIRATION OF THE CREDIT
ISSUED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE;
(3) A QUALIFIED COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT ENTITY FAILS TO
INVEST 100% OF THE CASH PURCHASE PRICE OF THE QUALIFIED EQUITY
INVESTMENT IN QUALIFIED LOW–INCOME COMMUNITY INVESTMENTS WITHIN 1
YEAR AFTER RECEIPT OF THE QUALIFIED EQUITY INVESTMENT;
(4) A QUALIFIED COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT ENTITY VIOLATES
SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION; OR
(5) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION, A QUALIFIED
COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT ENTITY FAILS TO MAINTAIN A QUALIFIED LOW–INCOME
COMMUNITY INVESTMENT EQUAL TO 100% OF THE CASH PURCHASE PRICE OF THE
QUALIFIED EQUITY INVESTMENT.
(C) (1) IF THE DEPARTMENT RECAPTURES A CREDIT UNDER
SUBSECTION (B)(1) OF THIS SECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL RECAPTURE AN
AMOUNT PROPORTIONAL TO THE AMOUNT OF THE FEDERAL TAX CREDIT
RECAPTURED.
(2) IF THE DEPARTMENT RECAPTURES A CREDIT UNDER
SUBSECTION (B)(2) OF THIS SECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL RECAPTURE AN
AMOUNT PROPORTIONAL TO THE AMOUNT OF THE REDEMPTION OR PAYMENT.
(D) (1) THE MAXIMUM AGGREGATE AMOUNT OF QUALIFIED LOW–INCOME
COMMUNITY INVESTMENTS MADE IN A QUALIFIED ACTIVE LOW–INCOME
COMMUNITY BUSINESS AND ANY AFFILIATED BUSINESS ENTITY EQUALS
$15,000,000, INCLUDING $7,500,000 FOR ANY INDIVIDUAL QUALIFIED LOW–INCOME
COMMUNITY INVESTMENT.
(2) THE MAXIMUM AMOUNT UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION IS EXCLUSIVE OF ANY PORTION OF A QUALIFIED LOW–INCOME
COMMUNITY INVESTMENT REDEEMED OR REPAID BY A QUALIFIED ACTIVE
LOW–INCOME COMMUNITY BUSINESS.

SENATE BILL 372 13
(E) (1) A QUALIFIED LOW–INCOME COMMUNITY INVESTMENT SHALL BE
CONSIDERED MAINTAINED BY THE QUALIFIED COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT ENTITY
EVEN IF THE INVESTMENT HAS BEEN TRANSFERRED, SOLD, OR REPAID IF THE
QUALIFIED COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT ENTITY REINVESTS AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO
THE CAPITAL OR EQUITY RETURNED OR RECOVERED FROM THE ORIGINAL
INVESTMENT EXCLUSIVE OF ANY PROFIT REALIZED IN ANOTHER QUALIFIED
LOW–INCOME COMMUNITY INVESTMENT IN THE STATE WITHIN 1 YEAR AFTER THE
RECEIPT OF THE CAPITAL OR EQUITY.
(2) A QUALIFIED LOW–INCOME COMMUNITY INVESTMENT SHALL BE
CONSIDERED MAINTAINED BY THE QUALIFIED COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT ENTITY
IF THE QUALIFIED COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT ENTITY RECEIVES PERIODIC LOAN
REPAYMENTS FROM A QUALIFIED ACTIVE LOW–INCOME COMMUNITY BUSINESS AND
THE QUALIFIED COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT ENTITY REINVESTS THE AMOUNT IN A
QUALIFIED LOW–INCOME COMMUNITY INVESTMENT BY THE END OF THE NEXT
CALENDAR YEAR.
(F) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION MAY BE CONSTRUED TO REQUIRE A
QUALIFIED COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT ENTITY TO REINVEST CAPITAL OR EQUITY
RETURNED FROM A LOW–INCOME COMMUNITY INVESTMENT AFTER THE SIXTH
TAXABLE YEAR IN WHICH THE QUALIFIED EQUITY INVESTMENT IS ELIGIBLE FOR A
CREDIT UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(G) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE WRITTEN NOTICE TO A
QUALIFIED COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT ENTITY OF ANY PROPOSED RECAPTURE OF
A CREDIT UNDER THIS SECTION.
(2) THE QUALIFIED COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT ENTITY SHALL CURE
ANY DEFICIENCY IDENTIFIED IN A NOTICE PROVIDED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION WITHIN 90 DAYS AFTER RECEIPT OF THE NOTICE.
(3) IF THE QUALIFIED COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT ENTITY FAILS TO
CURE A DEFICIENCY IDENTIFIED IN A NOTICE PROVIDED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION WITHIN 90 DAYS AFTER RECEIPT OF THE NOTICE, THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(I) PROVIDE A FINAL WRITTEN ORDER OF RECAPTURE TO THE
QUALIFIED COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT ENTITY; AND
(II) RECAPTURE THE CREDIT.

SENATE BILL 372
(4) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL REALLOCATE A CREDIT RECAPTURED
UNDER THIS SUBSECTION IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 4–3106(C) AND (D) OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
4–3109.
ON OR BEFORE MAY 1, 2027, AND EACH MAY 1 THEREAFTER, A QUALIFIED
COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT ENTITY, FOR EACH CREDIT CERTIFICATE ISSUED
UNDER THIS SUBTITLE FOR A QUALIFIED EQUITY INVESTMENT THAT HAS NOT BEEN
REDEEMED OR REPAID, SHALL REPORT TO THE DEPARTMENT FOR THE
IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING TAXABLE YEAR INFORMATION ABOUT EACH QUALIFIED
LOW–INCOME COMMUNITY INVESTMENT MADE BY THE QUALIFIED COMMUNITY
DEVELOPMENT ENTITY, INCLUDING:
(1) THE DATE, AMOUNT, AND EVIDENCE OF THE QUALIFIED
LOW–INCOME COMMUNITY INVESTMENT;
(2) THE NAME AND ADDRESS OF EACH QUALIFIED ACTIVE
LOW–INCOME COMMUNITY BUSINESS FUNDED BY THE QUALIFIED COMMUNITY
DEVELOPMENT ENTITY;
(3) FOR EACH QUALIFIED ACTIVE LOW–INCOME COMMUNITY
BUSINESS FUNDED BY THE QUALIFIED COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT ENTITY, THE
NUMBER AND AVERAGE ANNUAL SALARY OF EMPLOYEES WHO WERE:
(I) EMPLOYED PRIOR TO THE QUALIFIED LOW–INCOME
COMMUNITY INVESTMENT;
(II) EMPLOYED AT THE END OF THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING
CALENDAR YEAR; AND
(III) NEWLY HIRED AND RETAINED AS A RESULT OF THE
QUALIFIED LOW–INCOME COMMUNITY INVESTMENT;
(4) A BRIEF DESCRIPTION OF THE BUSINESS AND FINANCING OF EACH
QUALIFIED ACTIVE LOW–INCOME COMMUNITY BUSINESS FUNDED BY THE
QUALIFIED COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT ENTITY;
(5) A CERTIFICATION THAT THE QUALIFIED COMMUNITY
DEVELOPMENT ENTITY HAS UPDATED THE DEPARTMENT REGARDING ANY
CHANGES TO A QUALIFIED EQUITY INVESTMENT CERTIFIED UNDER § 4–3106 OF
THIS SUBTITLE, INCLUDING ANY TRANSFER OF A CERTIFICATION OR A CREDIT
CERTIFICATE IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBTITLE; AND

SENATE BILL 372 15
(6) A CERTIFICATION THAT NO CREDIT ISSUED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE
MEETS THE REQUIREMENTS FOR RECAPTURE UNDER § 4–3108 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
4–3110.
(A) THE DEPARTMENT MAY:
(1) CONDUCT PERIODIC EXAMINATIONS TO ENFORCE THIS SUBTITLE
AND TO VERIFY WHETHER AN EVENT HAS OCCURRED THAT WOULD RESULT IN
RECAPTURE OF A CREDIT ISSUED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(2) ISSUE, ON REQUEST, AN ADVISORY LETTER TO A QUALIFIED
COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT ENTITY ABOUT THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBTITLE
THAT:
(I) SHALL BIND THE DEPARTMENT, THE COMPTROLLER, AND
THE MARYLAND INSURANCE ADMINISTRATION; AND
(II) MAY NOT APPLY TO ANY PERSON OTHER THAN THE
QUALIFIED COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT ENTITY THAT REQUESTED THE ADVISORY
LETTER.
(B) WHEN CONDUCTING ENFORCEMENT ACTIVITIES AND ADMINISTERING
THE PROGRAM, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL CONSIDER GUIDANCE ISSUED UNDER THE
FEDERAL NEW MARKETS TAX CREDIT PROGRAM.
4–3111.
THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THE
PROVISIONS OF THIS SUBTITLE.
Article – Insurance
6–123.
A PERSON MAY CLAIM A CREDIT FOR A QUALIFIED EQUITY INVESTMENT AS
PROVIDED UNDER TITLE 4, SUBTITLE 31 OF THE HOUSING AND COMMUNITY
DEVELOPMENT ARTICLE.
6–306.

SENATE BILL 372
A PERSON MAY CLAIM A CREDIT FOR A QUALIFIED EQUITY INVESTMENT AS
PROVIDED UNDER TITLE 4, SUBTITLE 31 OF THE HOUSING AND COMMUNITY
DEVELOPMENT ARTICLE.
Article – Tax – General
10–758.
A PERSON MAY CLAIM A CREDIT FOR A QUALIFIED EQUITY INVESTMENT AS
PROVIDED UNDER TITLE 4, SUBTITLE 31 OF THE HOUSING AND COMMUNITY
DEVELOPMENT ARTICLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025.